Washington statutes.
RCW 19.116.010

Public interest—Finding.

The legislature finds that the practice of unlawful subleasing or unlawful transfer of an ownership interest in motor vehicles is a matter vitally affecting the public interest for the purpose of applying the consumer protection act, chapter 19.86 RCW.

[ 1990 c 44 s 2.]